Alaska statutes. Title 46. Water, Air, Energy, and Environmental Conservation.
Article 3. Water Pollution Control and Waste Disposal.

Administrative Code. —

For solid waste management, see 18 AAC 60.

For waste disposal permit, see 18 AAC 60, art. 2.

For water quality standards, see 18 AAC 70.

For wastewater treatment and disposal, see 18 AAC 72.

For Alaska clean water and drinking water revolving loan funds, see 18 AAC 76.

For drinking water, see 18 AAC 80.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 136, SLA 2004 (HB 524), amending provisions in this article relating to control of the treatment and disposal of waste, the waste disposal permitting process, and proof of financial responsibility for certain types of municipal solid waste and mining waste treatment and disposal facilities, see 2004 House Journal 2754 — 2756.

Collateral references. —

39A C.J.S., Health and Environment, § 98 et seq., 164

93 C.J.S. Waters, § 94 et seq.

Tenant’s remedy against stranger for wrongful pollution of waters. 12 ALR2d 1192.

Liability for pollution of stream by oil, water, or the like flowing from well. 19 ALR2d 1025.

Validity, construction, and effect of statute, ordinance, or other measure involving chemical treatment of public water supply. 43 ALR2d 453.

Measure and elements of damages for pollution of stream. 49 ALR2d 253.

Validity of prohibition of regulation of bathing, swimming, boating, fishing, or the like, to protect public water supply. 56 ALR2d 790.

Validity and construction of anti-water pollution statutes and ordinances. 32 ALR3d 215.

Landowner’s right to relief against pollution of his water supply by industrial or commercial waste. 39 ALR3d 910.

Validity and construction of statutes, ordinances, or regulations controlling discharge of industrial wastes into sewer system. 47 ALR3d 1224.

Private landowner’s disposal of solid waste on own property. 37 ALR4th 635.

Construction and application of pollution exclusion clause in liability insurance policy. 39 ALR4th 1047.

Measure and elements of damages for pollution of well or spring. 76 ALR4th 629.

Sec. 46.03.050.
Authority.

The department has jurisdiction to prevent and abate the pollution of the waters of the state.

History.

(§ 3 ch 120 SLA 1971)

Administrative Code. —

For statewide standards, see 18 AAC 70, art. 1.

For exceptions to statewide standards, see 18 AAC 70, art. 2.

For domestic wastewater treatment and disposal, see 18 AAC 72, art. 1.

For domestic wastewater system plan review, see 18 AAC 72, art. 2.

For certified installer program, see 18 AAC 72, art. 4.

For nondomestic wastewater, see 18 AAC 72, art. 5.

For nondomestic wastewater system plan review, see 18 AAC 72, art. 6.

For discharge reporting, cleanup, and disposal of oil and other hazardous substances, see 18 AAC 75, art. 3.

For corrective action for leaking underground storage tanks, see 18 AAC 78, art. 2.

For cleanup levels, see 18 AAC 78, art. 6.

For public water system review and approval requirements, see 18 AAC 80, art. 2.

For standards, monitoring, variances, and exemptions, see 18 AAC 80, art. 3.

For coliform bacteria requirements, see 18 AAC 80, art. 4.

For lead and copper requirements, see 18 AAC 80, art. 5.

For surface water treatment, see 18 AAC 80, art. 6.

For enhanced surface water treatment, see 18 AAC 80, art. 7.

For disinfection and disinfection by-products, see 18 AAC 80, art. 9.

For public notification requirements, see 18 AAC 80, art. 10.

For laboratory certification requirements, see 18 AAC 80, art. 11.

For purpose, applicability, and term, see 18 AAC 83, art. 1.

For permit process, see 18 AAC 83, art. 2.

For permit application requirements, see 18 AAC 83, art. 4.

For permit conditions — general, see 18 AAC 83, art. 5.

For requirements and permit conditions specific to type of discharge, see 18 AAC 83, art. 6.

Sec. 46.03.060.
Water pollution control plan.

The department shall develop comprehensive plans for water pollution control in the state and conduct investigations it considers advisable and necessary for the discharge of its duties.

History.

(§ 3 ch 120 SLA 1971)

Collateral references. —

Validity of prohibition or regulation of bathing, swimming, boating, fishing, etc., to protect public water supply. 56 ALR2d 790.

Sec. 46.03.070.
Pollution standards.

After public hearing, the department may adopt standards and make them public and determine what qualities and properties of water indicate a polluted condition actually or potentially deleterious, harmful, detrimental, or injurious to the public health, safety, or welfare, to terrestrial and aquatic life or their growth and propagation, or to the use of waters for domestic, commercial, industrial, agricultural, recreational, or other reasonable purposes.

History.

(§ 3 ch 120 SLA 1971)

Administrative Code. —

For informal and fee review procedures, see 18 AAC 15, art. 5.

For monofills, see 18 AAC 60, art. 4.

For monitoring and corrective action requirements, see 18 AAC 60, art. 7.

For statewide standards, see 18 AAC 70, art. 1.

For exceptions to statewide standards, see 18 AAC 70, art. 2.

For domestic wastewater treatment and disposal, see 18 AAC 72, art. 1.

For certified installer program, see 18 AAC 72, art. 4.

For public water system review and approval requirements, see 18 AAC 80, art. 2.

For standards, monitoring, variances, and exemptions, see 18 AAC 80, art. 3.

For coliform bacteria requirements, see 18 AAC 80, art. 4.

For lead and copper requirements, see 18 AAC 80, art. 5.

For surface water treatment, see 18 AAC 80, art. 6.

For enhanced surface water treatment, see 18 AAC 80, art. 7.

For disinfection and disinfection by-products, see 18 AAC 80, art. 9.

For public notification requirements, see 18 AAC 80, art. 10.

For laboratory certification requirements, see 18 AAC 80, art. 11.

Sec. 46.03.080.
Quality and purity standards.

After study and public hearings held upon due notice, the department may establish standards of quality and purity or group the designated waters of the state into classes as to minimum quality and purity, or both.
The department shall classify waters in accordance with considerations of best usage in the interest of the public.
The department may alter and modify classifications after hearing.

History.

(§ 3 ch 120 SLA 1971)

Administrative Code. —

For municipal solid waste landfills, see 18 AAC 60, art. 3.

For statewide standards, see 18 AAC 70, art. 1.

For exceptions to statewide standards, see 18 AAC 70, art. 2.

For domestic wastewater treatment and disposal, see 18 AAC 72, art. 1.

For domestic wastewater system plan review, see 18 AAC 72, art. 2.

For certified installer program, see 18 AAC 72, art. 4.

Sec. 46.03.090.
Plans for pollution disposal. [Repealed, § 12 ch 136 SLA 2004.]

Sec. 46.03.100.
Waste management, disposal, and discharge authorization.

A person may not construct, modify, or operate a sewerage system or treatment works or take any action that results in the disposal or discharge of solid or liquid waste material or heated process or cooling water into the waters or onto the land of the state without prior authorization from the department.

Prior authorization may be provided by the department, in its discretion, through one or a combination of the following:

an individual permit issued for a specific facility or disposal activity;

a general permit issued on a statewide, regional, or other geographical basis for a category of disposal activities that the commissioner, using information available when the permit is developed, determines are similar in nature and will comply with applicable environmental quality standards established under this title;

regulations adopted by the department authorizing a category of disposal without requiring a permit and establishing specific siting or operational requirements, discharge limits, or best management practices for the disposal category;

designation and approval of a plan as described under (c) of this section;

an integrated waste management and disposal authorization as described in (d) of this section.

The department may require the submission of plans for review and written approval before construction, extension, installation, modification, or operation of a publicly or privately owned or operated sewerage system or treatment works. If the sewerage system or treatment works is designed to prevent disposal from the system or works outside of containment under normal operating conditions, the department may designate that the plan approval constitutes the authorization required under (a) of this section.

The department may issue an integrated waste management and disposal authorization covering multiple related or unrelated waste management or disposal activities to be conducted at a facility, including generation, treatment, storage, and disposal of solid or liquid waste. An integrated waste management and disposal authorization may include the authorizations in (b) and (c) of this section and a water-quality-related certification required by 33 U.S.C. 1341 for the discharge of dredged or fill materials or of pollutants to surface waters from point sources.

This section does not apply to

a person discharging only domestic sewage into a publicly owned treatment works;

disposals subject to regulation under AS

31.05.030(e)(2)

;

injection projects permitted under AS

31.05.030(h)

;

discharges of solid or liquid waste material or water discharges from the following activities if the discharge is incidental to the activity and the activity does not produce a discharge from a point source, as that term is defined in regulations adopted under this chapter, into any waters of the United States:

mineral drilling, trenching, ditching, and similar activities;

landscaping;

water well drilling and geophysical drilling; or

drilling, ditching, trenching, and similar activities associated with facility construction and maintenance or with road or other transportation facility construction and maintenance; however, the exemption provided by this subparagraph does not relieve a person from obtaining a prior authorization under this section if the drilling, ditching, trenching, or similar activity will involve the removal of the groundwater, stormwater, or wastewater runoff that has accumulated and is present at an excavation site for facility, road, or other transportation construction or maintenance and a prior authorization is otherwise required by this section;

bilge pumping, unless the bilge product pumped may be expected to yield an oily sludge, emulsion, or sheen on the surface of any water of the state;

cooling water discharges from a boat or vessel into any surface water of the state; or

the firing or other use of munitions in training activities conducted on active ranges, including active ranges operated by the United States Department of Defense or a United States military agency or service, unless otherwise regulated under 33 U.S.C. 1251 — 1376 (Federal Water Pollution Control Act), as amended.

A person who applies for an authorization to operate a solid waste disposal facility that accepts hazardous waste or a mining waste disposal facility for an operation that chemically processes ores or has the potential to generate acid shall furnish to the department proof of financial responsibility to manage and close the facility in a manner that the department finds will control or minimize the risk of the release of unauthorized levels of pollutants from the facility to waters. The department may require that a municipal solid waste disposal facility furnish proof of financial responsibility. Proof of financial responsibility may be demonstrated by self-insurance, insurance, surety bond, corporate guarantee, letter of credit, certificate of deposit, or other proof of financial responsibility approved by the department, under regulations adopted by the department. Regulations adopted under this subsection must set financial tests for the acceptance of corporate guarantees and other forms of financial responsibility that the department determines would be required for an independent showing of financial capability. For a mining waste disposal facility, the department may accept as adequate to satisfy the requirement of this subsection financial assurance for reclamation provided to a state or federal land management agency if it otherwise meets the requirements of this subsection. The department’s acceptance of proof of financial responsibility under this subsection expires

one year after its issuance for self-insurance, unless the department accepts a renewal of the same self-insurance demonstration after a financial review under regulations adopted by the department;

on the effective date of a change in the insurance agreement, surety bond, corporate guarantee, letter of credit, or certificate of deposit;

on the expiration or cancellation of the insurance agreement, surety bond, corporate guarantee, letter of credit, or certificate of deposit.

A person who applies for a solid waste disposal authorization under this section, except for an authorization under (b)(2) of this section or an authorization to dispose of municipal solid waste, shall demonstrate to the satisfaction of the department that the applicant has reasonably considered all solid waste management options and that the authorization would be consistent with the practices and priorities established under AS

46.06.021

.

The program developed to issue permits by the department to authorize discharge of pollutants into surface waters and submitted to the United States Environmental Protection Agency for approval under 33 U.S.C. 1342 (sec. 402, Clean Water Act) shall include the monitoring and reporting requirements included in the permits, limited to those requirements authorized by law, including 33 U.S.C. 1318 (sec. 308, Clean Water Act), and any legal settlements, and those necessary to ascertain compliance with the effluent limitations contained in the permit and with state water quality standards.

A person who applies for a permit under the program may review and provide comments and amendments to a draft permit and discuss the draft permit with the staff of the department before that draft permit undergoes public notice and comment under AS

46.03.110

.

A person who applies for a permit under the program has the opportunity to review a proposed final permit and discuss it with the staff of the department before the department issues the permit.

A permit issued under the program is not automatically stayed by the filing of a request for an adjudicatory hearing on the permit; a request to stay a permit issued under the program shall be decided by the commissioner or the commissioner’s designee.

Permits issued under this section shall be issued as expeditiously as possible.

For purposes of the permit program authorized by the United States Environmental Protection Agency under 33 U.S.C. 1342 (sec. 402, Clean Water Act), “waste material” includes pollutants, as defined in 33 U.S.C. 1362(6) (sec. 502(6), Clean Water Act).

History.

(§ 3 ch 120 SLA 1971; am § 3 ch 220 SLA 1976; am § 9 ch 93 SLA 1981; am § 4 ch 91 SLA 1984; am § 3 ch 88 SLA 1990; am §§ 2, 3 ch 11 SLA 1995; am § 7 ch 140 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 44 SLA 2002; am § 7 ch 49 SLA 2002; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 52 SLA 2002; am § 51 ch 49 SLA 2004; am § 3 ch 136 SLA 2004; am § 3 ch 95 SLA 2005; am §§ 2 — 6 ch 17 SLA 2008; am § 1 ch 5 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsections (b) and (c) were formerly (c) and (b), respectively. Relettered in 1987. Subsection (i) was enacted as (h) and relettered in 2002.

Cross references. —

For further requirements for persons submitting proof of financial ability under this section, see AS

46.03.833

.

Administrative Code. —

For coverage of chapter, see 18 AAC 15, art. 1.

For permit procedures, see 18 AAC 15, art. 2.

For informal and fee review procedures, see 18 AAC 15, art. 5.

For administrative appeal proceedures, see 18 AAC 15, art. 6.

For waste disposal permit, see 18 AAC 60, art. 2.

For municipal solid waste landfills, see 18 AAC 60, art. 3.

For monofills, see 18 AAC 60, art. 4.

For land application of biosolids, see 18 AAC 60, art. 5.

For reserved, see 18 AAC 60, art. 6.

For monitoring and corrective action requirements, see 18 AAC 60, art. 7.

For statewide standards, see 18 AAC 70, art. 1.

For exceptions to statewide standards, see 18 AAC 70, art. 2.

For domestic wastewater treatment and disposal, see 18 AAC 72, art. 1.

For domestic wastewater system plan review, see 18 AAC 72, art. 2.

For certified installer program, see 18 AAC 72, art. 4.

For nondomestic wastewater, see 18 AAC 72, art. 5.

For nondomestic wastewater system plan review, see 18 AAC 72, art. 6.

For purpose, applicability, and term, see 18 AAC 83, art. 1.

For permit process, see 18 AAC 83, art. 2.

For permit application requirements, see 18 AAC 83, art. 4.

For permit conditions — general, see 18 AAC 83, art. 5.

For requirements and permit conditions specific to type of discharge, see 18 AAC 83, art. 6.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 8, 2013, in (e)(7), substituted “United States military agency or service, unless otherwise regulated under 33 U.S.C. 1251 — 1376 (Federal Water Pollution Control Act), as amended” for “United States military agency unless it results in a discharge into waters of the United States”.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 95, SLA 2005 (SB 110), proposing state administration and enforcement of the National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System, as authorized by the 2005 addition of subsections (h) — (k) of this section, see 2005 Senate Journal 319 — 321.

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 17, SLA 2008 (HB 149) relating to amendments to this section applicable to the authority of the Department of Environmental Conservation for pollutant discharge activities into state water, described as “an essential component of the state’s efforts to receive primacy from the [Environmental Protection Agency]”, see 2007 House Journal 287 — 289.

Opinions of attorney general. —

This section confers upon the Department of Environmental Conservation permit authority over dredge or fill activities, including residential subdivisions, within wetlands, estuaries, and inland and coastal marshes periodically inundated by discernible bodies of fresh or salt water upland from the mean high tide line to the extent of the aquatic or salt water vegetation line.
Nov. 13, 1975 Op. Att’y Gen.

Dredge or fill activities in coastal and fresh water wetlands shoreward to the aquatic vegetation line do result in the disposal of solid waste material into the waters of the state within the meaning of this section and thus, to the extent that these activities are of a commercial or industrial nature, do require a permit from the Department of Environmental Conservation.
Nov. 13, 1975 Op. Att’y Gen.

The state has jurisdiction to require permits of government contractors discharging sewage from a federally-owned treatment plant.
June 28, 1977 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 46.03.110.
Waste disposal permit procedure.

An application for a permit under AS

46.03.100(b)(1)

or (2) or an authorization under AS

46.03.100(d)

shall be made on forms prescribed by the department. Forms must contain the name and address of the applicant, a description of the applicant’s operations, the quantity and type of waste material sought to be disposed of, the proposed method of disposal, and any other information considered necessary by the department. The applicant may request that a general permit be issued, or the department may, on its own initiative, propose that an applicant be authorized under a general permit.

After receipt of a proper application for an individual or general permit or a determination by the department that a general permit should be proposed, the department shall publish notice of the application or proposal, or of the availability of a draft permit for comment, as applicable, in at least two publications of a newspaper of general circulation within the general area in which the disposal of waste material is proposed to be made. The notice shall also be posted on the Alaska Online Public Notice System maintained under AS

44.62.175

and may also be published in other appropriate information media. The notice must include a statement that a person who wants to present views to the department with regard to the application or proposal may do so in writing to the department within 30 days after the first publication of the notice. The written response entitles the writer to a copy of the application or draft permit, and, in the case of an application or proposal to issue a general permit, the application or proposal shall also be posted by the department on the Internet at the same time that notice is published under this subsection.

When the department receives an application or makes a proposal that a general permit be issued, the commissioner shall immediately send copies of the application or proposal to the commissioner of fish and game, the commissioner of natural resources, the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development, and the commissioner of health and social services.

The department may specify in a permit or other authorization the terms and conditions under which waste material or water may be disposed of. The terms and conditions shall be directed to avoiding pollution and to otherwise carry out the policies of this chapter. The commissioner may provide, as a term of a general permit, that a person intending to dispose of waste material or water under the general permit shall first obtain specific authorization from the department. A general permit shall be posted on the Internet by the department; the posting must include the names of persons authorized to make disposals under the permit and the locations at which disposals may be made if those locations are specifically authorized under this subsection. A permit may not be issued for a term in excess of five years from the date of issuance. The department may prescribe in regulations the circumstances under which an expiring permit may be administratively continued.

If the department has certified a National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit under 33 U.S.C. 1341 (sec. 401, Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972), and the United States Environmental Protection Agency has issued that permit to a person, the department may waive the requirements of this section, and adopt the federal permit as the permit required under AS

46.03.100

.

The standards for determining waste material in AS

46.03.100(m)

apply to this section.

History.

(am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1971; § 3 ch 120 SLA 1971; am § 116 ch 218 SLA 1976; am §§ 4, 5 ch 220 SLA 1976; am §§ 4 — 7 ch 52 SLA 2002; am §§ 4 — 6 ch 136 SLA 2004; am §§ 4 — 6 ch 143 SLA 2004; am § 7 ch 17 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (c) of this section, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in (c) of this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For coverage of chapter, see 18 AAC 15, art. 1.

For permit procedures, see 18 AAC 15, art. 2.

For adoption of npdes permits, see 18 AAC 15, art. 3.

For certification, see 18 AAC 15, art. 4.

For informal and fee review procedures, see 18 AAC 15, art. 5.

For administrative appeal proceedures, see 18 AAC 15, art. 6.

For waste disposal permit, see 18 AAC 60, art. 2.

For municipal solid waste landfills, see 18 AAC 60, art. 3.

For monofills, see 18 AAC 60, art. 4.

For land application of biosolids, see 18 AAC 60, art. 5.

For reserved, see 18 AAC 60, art. 6.

For monitoring and corrective action requirements, see 18 AAC 60, art. 7.

For applicability and basic requirements, see 18 AAC 63, art. 1.

For statewide standards, see 18 AAC 70, art. 1.

For exceptions to statewide standards, see 18 AAC 70, art. 2.

For purpose, applicability, and term, see 18 AAC 83, art. 1.

For permit process, see 18 AAC 83, art. 2.

For permit application requirements, see 18 AAC 83, art. 4.

For permit conditions — general, see 18 AAC 83, art. 5.

For requirements and permit conditions specific to type of discharge, see 18 AAC 83, art. 6.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 143, SLA 2004 (HB 546), amending this section to authorize the state to administer National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System (NPDES) permits for the timber industry, see 2004 House Journal 3084 — 3085.

Opinions of attorney general. —

This section requires no more than that the Department of Environmental Conservation allow a 30-day public comment period, and that it fully and completely review those comments on receipt.
June 11, 1975 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Department of Environmental Conservation cannot issue a waste disposal permit prior to expiration of the 30-day public comment period.
June 11, 1975 Op. Att’y Gen.

If the Department of Environmental Conservation has reviewed and considered all public and agency comments prior to the expiration of the 60-day period, and has also completed the preparation of the permit itself within that period, it would be competent for the department to waive the remainder of the 60-day “pre-commencement” period, and issue the permit at that time.
June 11, 1975 Op. Att’y Gen.

The public comments received pursuant to subsection (b) of this section function similarly to environmental impact statements for federal agencies contemplating major federal actions significantly affecting the quality of the environment. June 11, 1975 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 46.03.120.
Termination or modification of waste management and disposal authorization.

The department may terminate a permit or other authorization issued under AS

46.03.100

or may rescind a person’s authority to dispose of waste in accordance with regulations adopted under AS

46.03.100(b)(3)

upon 30 days’ written notice if the department finds

that the permit or other authorization was procured by misrepresentation of material fact or by failure of the applicant to disclose fully the facts relating to its issuance;

that there has been a violation of the conditions of the permit or other authorization;

that there has been a material change in the quantity or type of waste disposed of; or

for a permit issued under a federally approved program under 33 U.S.C. 1342 (sec. 402, Clean Water Act), that

a change in any condition of the receiving environment or the quality of discharge requires either a temporary or permanent reduction of the authorization or elimination of the authorized discharge; or

the permittee had made a material misrepresentation of fact to the department relevant to the authorized activity at any time.

The department may modify a permit or other authorization issued under AS

46.03.100

, or may rescind a person’s authority to dispose of waste in accordance with regulations adopted under AS

46.03.100(b)(3)

,

for any of the causes for termination listed in (a) of this section;

if the department finds that a material change in the quality or classification of the waters of the state has occurred; or

in the case of a permit issued under a federally approved program under 33 U.S.C. 1342 (sec. 402, Clean Water Act), as provided in regulations adopted under AS

46.03.020

(12).

Nothing in this section limits the authority of the department to terminate or modify a permit or plan approval under other circumstances if requested to do so by the permittee or plan holder.

History.

(§ 3 ch 120 SLA 1971; am §§ 7, 8 ch 136 SLA 2004; am § 7 ch 143 SLA 2004; am § 4 ch 95 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For waste disposal permit, see 18 AAC 60, art. 2.

For domestic wastewater system plan review, see 18 AAC 72, art. 2.

For permit process, see 18 AAC 83, art. 2.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 143, SLA 2004 (HB 546), amending this system to authorize the state to administer National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System (NPDES) permits for the timber industry, see 2004 House Journal 3084 — 3085.

Sec. 46.03.130.
Compliance order. [Repealed, § 19 ch 220 SLA 1976. For current law, see AS 46.03.850.]

Secs. 46.03.140 — 46.03.230.
Air pollution control. [Repealed, § 27 ch 74 SLA 1993. For current provisions, see AS 46.14.]

Sec. 46.03.240.
Construction and implementation of AS 46.03.230.
[Repealed, § 19 ch 220 SLA 1976.]

Sec. 46.03.245.
Air pollution control.
[Repealed, § 27 ch 74 SLA 1993.]